Illinois, session 104th, HB1468.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Public 5Safety and Justice Privacy Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Assistant Public Defender" and "Assistant State's 8Attorney" have the meanings given to those terms in Section 15 9of the Public Interest Attorney Assistance Act. 10    "First responder" means a law enforcement officer or 11fireman as defined in Section 2 of the Line of Duty 12Compensation Act, an "emergency medical technician (EMT)" as 13defined in Section 3.50 of the Emergency Medical Services 14(EMS) Systems Act, and any other person who is at least 18 15years of age who has successfully completed a course of 16instruction in emergency medical responder first response as 17prescribed by the Illinois Department of Public Health, and 18who provides first response services prior to the arrival of 19an ambulance or specialized emergency medical services 20vehicle, in accordance with the level of care established in 21the emergency medical responder first response course.22    "Governmental agency", "personal information", "publicly 23available content", and "publicly post" or "publicly display"   HB1468- 2 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1have the meanings given to those terms in 1-10 of Judicial 2Privacy Act.3    "Home address" includes an official's permanent residence 4and any secondary residences affirmatively identified by the 5official, but does not include an official's work address.6    "Immediate family" includes an official's spouse, child, 7parent, or any blood relative of the official or the 8official's spouse who lives in the same residence.9    "Official" includes:10        (1) First responder.11        (2) Member or former member of the Illinois General 12    Assembly.13        (3) Prosecutor.14        (4) Public defender.15        (5) Probation officer.16    "Probation officer" has the meaning given to that term in 17Section 9b of the Probation and Probation Officers Act.18    "Prosecutor" means a State's Attorney, Assistant State's 19Attorney, or a prosecutor for a unit of local government.20    "Public defender" means a Public Defender or an Assistant 21Public Defender.22    "Written request" means written notice signed by an 23official or a representative of the official's employer 24requesting a governmental agency, person, business, or 25association to refrain from posting or displaying publicly 26available content that includes the official's personal   HB1468- 3 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1information.  2    Section 10. Publicly posting or displaying an official's 3personal information by governmental agencies.4    (a) Governmental agencies shall not publicly post or 5display publicly available content that includes an official's 6personal information if the governmental agency has received a 7written request in accordance with Section 20 that it refrain 8from disclosing the official's personal information. After a 9governmental agency has received a written request, that 10agency shall remove the official's personal information from 11publicly available content within 5 business days. After the 12governmental agency has removed the official's personal 13information from publicly available content, the agency shall 14not publicly post or display the information and the 15official's personal information shall be exempt from the 16Freedom of Information Act, unless the governmental agency has 17received consent from the official to make the personal 18information available to the public.19    (b) If a governmental agency fails to comply with a 20written request to refrain from disclosing personal 21information, the official may bring an action in the circuit 22court seeking injunctive or declaratory relief. 23    Section 15. Publicly posting an official's personal 24information on the Internet by persons, businesses, and   HB1468- 4 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1associations.2    (a) Prohibited Conduct.3        (1) All persons, businesses, and associations shall 4    refrain from publicly posting or displaying on the 5    Internet publicly available content that includes an 6    official's personal information if the official has made a 7    written request to the person, business, or association 8    that it refrain from disclosing the personal information.9        (2) No person, business, or association shall solicit, 10    sell, or trade on the Internet an official's personal 11    information with the intent to pose an imminent and 12    serious threat to the health and safety of the official or 13    the official's immediate family.14        (3) This subsection includes, but is not limited to, 15    Internet phone directories, Internet search engines, 16    Internet data aggregators, and Internet service providers.17    (b) Required Conduct.18        (1) After a person, business, or association has 19    received a written request from an official to protect the 20    privacy of the officer's personal information, that 21    person, business, or association shall have 72 hours to 22    remove the personal information from the Internet.23        (2) After a person, business, or association has 24    received a written request from an official, that person, 25    business, or association shall ensure that the official's 26    personal information is not made available on any website   HB1468- 5 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    or subsidiary website controlled by that person, business, 2    or association.3        (3) After receiving an official's written request, no 4    person, business, or association shall transfer the 5    official's personal information to any other person, 6    business, or association through any medium.7    (c) Redress. An official whose personal information is 8made public as a result of a violation of this Section may 9bring an action in the circuit court seeking injunctive or 10declaratory relief. If the court grants injunctive or 11declaratory relief, the person, business, or association 12responsible for the violation shall be required to pay the 13official's costs and reasonable attorney's fees. 14    Section 20. Procedure for completing a written request. 15    (a) No governmental agency, person, business, or 16association shall be found to have violated any provision of 17this Act if the official fails to submit a written request 18calling for the protection of the officer's personal 19information.20    (b) A written request is valid if:21        (1) the official sends a written request directly to 22    the governmental agency, person, business, or association; 23    or24        (2) the Secretary of State creates a policy and 25    procedure for an official to file a written request with   HB1468- 6 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    the Secretary of State to notify governmental agencies and 2    the official sends the written request to the Secretary of 3    State as provided in the policy and procedure. In each 4    quarter of a calendar year, the Secretary of State shall 5    provide to the appropriate officer with ultimate 6    supervisory authority for a governmental agency a list of 7    all officials who have submitted a written request to the 8    Secretary of State. The officer shall promptly provide a 9    copy of the list to any and all governmental agencies 10    under the officer's supervision. Receipt by a governmental 11    agency of the written request list compiled by the 12    Secretary of State shall constitute a written request to 13    that agency for the purposes of this Act.14    (c) A representative from the official's employer may 15submit a written request on the official's behalf if the 16official gives written consent to the representative and the 17representative agrees to furnish a copy of that consent when a 18written request is made. The representative shall submit the 19written request as provided in subsection (b).20    (d) An official's written request shall specify what 21personal information shall be maintained private.22    If an official wishes to identify a secondary residence as 23a home address, the designation shall be made in the written 24request.25    An official shall disclose the identity of the officer's 26immediate family and indicate that the personal information of   HB1468- 7 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1these family members shall also be excluded to the extent that 2it could reasonably be expected to reveal the personal 3information of the official.4    (e) An official's written request is valid until the 5official provides the governmental agency, person, business, 6or association with written permission to release the private 7information. An official's written request expires on death. 8    Section 25. Unlawful publication of personal information. 9    (a) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly and 10publicly post on the Internet the personal information of an 11official or of the official's immediate family if the person 12knows or reasonably should know that publicly posting the 13personal information poses an imminent and serious threat to 14the health and safety of the official or the official's 15immediate family and the violation is a proximate cause of 16bodily injury or death of the official or a member of the 17official's immediate family. A person who violates this 18Section is guilty of a Class 3 felony.19    (b) If an employee of a governmental agency has complied 20with the provisions of this Act, it is not a violation of 21subsection (a) if the employee publishes personal information, 22in good faith, on the website of the governmental agency in the 23ordinary course of carrying out public functions.  24    Section 30. Construction. This Act and any rules adopted   HB1468- 8 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1to implement this Act shall be construed broadly to favor the 2protection of the personal information of officials.  3    Section 100. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 4changing Section 7 as follows: 5    (5 ILCS 140/7)6    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 7    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 8record that contains information that is exempt from 9disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 10that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 11to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 12shall make the remaining information available for inspection 13and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 14be exempt from inspection and copying: 15        (a) Information specifically prohibited from 16    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 17    regulations implementing federal or State law. 18        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 19    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 20    or a court order. 21        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 22    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 23    specifically designed to provide information to one or 24    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or   HB1468- 9 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 2        (c) Personal information contained within public 3    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 4    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 5    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 6    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 7    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 8    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 9    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 10    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 11    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 12    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 13    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 14    privacy. 15        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 16    created in the course of administrative enforcement 17    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 18    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 19    extent that disclosure would: 20            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 21        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 22        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 23        agency that is the recipient of the request; 24            (ii) interfere with active administrative 25        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 26        that is the recipient of the request;   HB1468- 10 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 2        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 3        hearing; 4            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 5        confidential source, confidential information 6        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 7        who file complaints with or provide information to 8        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 9        penal agencies; except that the identities of 10        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 11        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 12        local government, except when disclosure would 13        interfere with an active criminal investigation 14        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 15        request; 16            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 17        techniques other than those generally used and known 18        or disclose internal documents of correctional 19        agencies related to detection, observation, or 20        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 21        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 22        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 23        request; 24            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 25        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 26            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation   HB1468- 11 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 2        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 3    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 4    record management system if the law enforcement agency 5    that is the recipient of the request did not create the 6    record, did not participate in or have a role in any of the 7    events which are the subject of the record, and only has 8    access to the record through the shared electronic record 9    management system. 10        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 11    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 12    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 13    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 14    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 15    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 16    Board. 17        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 18    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 19    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 20        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 21    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 22        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 23    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 24    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 25    materials are available in the library of the correctional 26    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is   HB1468- 12 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    confined. 2        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 3    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 4    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 5    materials include records from staff members' personnel 6    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 7    information. 8        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 9    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 10    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 11    through an administrative request to the Department of 12    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 13    Mental Health. 14        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 15    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 16    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 17    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 18    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 19    institution or facility.20        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 21    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 22    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 23    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 24    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited 25    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 26    or school address, work telephone number, social security   HB1468- 13 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    number, or any other identifying information, except as 2    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 3    or claim. 4        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 5    requested by a person committed to the Department of 6    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 7    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 8    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 9    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 10    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 11    claim. 12        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 13    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 14    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 15    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 16    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 17    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 18    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 19    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 20    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 21        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 22    information obtained from a person or business where the 23    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 24    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 25    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 26    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would   HB1468- 14 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 2    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 3    requested.4        The information included under this exemption includes 5    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 6    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 7    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 8    company within the investment portfolio of a private 9    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 10    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 11    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 12    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 13    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 14    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 15    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 16    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 17    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 18    privately held company may cause competitive harm.19        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 20    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 21    to disclosure. 22        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 23    agreement, including information which if it were 24    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 25    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 26    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection   HB1468- 15 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 2    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 3    award or final selection is made. 4        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 5    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 6    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 7    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 8    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 9    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 10    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 11    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 12    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 13    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 14    legal rights of the general public. 15        (j) The following information pertaining to 16    educational matters:17            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 18        examination data used to administer an academic 19        examination; 20            (ii) information received by a primary or 21        secondary school, college, or university under its 22        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 23        their academic peers; 24            (iii) information concerning a school or 25        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 26        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would   HB1468- 16 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and2            (iv) course materials or research materials used 3        by faculty members. 4        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 5    submissions, and other construction related technical 6    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 7    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 8    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 9    including, but not limited to, power generating and 10    distribution stations and other transmission and 11    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 12    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 13    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 14    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 15    security. 16        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 17    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 18    public body makes the minutes available to the public 19    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 20        (m) Communications between a public body and an 21    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 22    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 23    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 24    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 25    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 26    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with   HB1468- 17 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 2        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 3    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 4    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 5    cases in which discipline is imposed. 6        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 7    with automated data processing operations, including, but 8    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 9    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 10    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 11    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 12    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 13    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 14    security of the system or its data or the security of 15    materials exempt under this Section. 16        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 17    between public bodies and their employees or 18    representatives, except that any final contract or 19    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 20        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 21    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 22    an applicant for a license or employment. 23        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 24    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 25    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 26    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually   HB1468- 18 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 2    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 3    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 4    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 5    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 6    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 7    until a sale is consummated. 8        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 9    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 10    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 11    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 12    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 13    intergovernmental risk management association or 14    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 15    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 16        (t) Information contained in or related to 17    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 18    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 19    for the regulation or supervision of financial 20    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 21    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 22    law. 23        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 24    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 25    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 26    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform   HB1468- 19 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    Electronic Transactions Act. 2        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 3    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 4    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 5    community's population or systems, facilities, or 6    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 7    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 8    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 9    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 10    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 11    include such things as details pertaining to the 12    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 13    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 14    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 15        (w) (Blank). 16        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 17    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 18    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 19    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 20    Illinois Power Agency. 21        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 22    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 23    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 24    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 25    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 26    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce   HB1468- 20 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    Commission. 2        (z) Information about students exempted from 3    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 4    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 5    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 6    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 7    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 8        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 9    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 10        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 11    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 12    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 13    Mortality Review Team Act. 14        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 15    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 16    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 17    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.18        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 19    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 20    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 21    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 22        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 23    information of persons who are minors and are also 24    participants and registrants in programs of park 25    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 26    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation   HB1468- 21 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    associations.2        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 3    information of participants and registrants in programs of 4    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 5    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 6    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 7    minors.8        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 9    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 10    2012. 11        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 12    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 13    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 14    School Code and any information contained in that report. 15        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 16    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 17    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 18    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 19    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 20    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 21    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 22    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 23    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 24    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 25    Corrections.26        (jj) Confidential information described in Section   HB1468- 22 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 2        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 3    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 4    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 5    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 6    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 7    of a governmental entity or a person. 8        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 9    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 10    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 11    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 12    the procedure.13        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 14    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 15    Confidential Reporting Act. 16        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 17    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 18    Act. 19        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 20    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 21        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 22    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 23    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 24    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 25    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 26    Act.  HB1468- 23 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 2    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 3        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 4    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 5        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 6    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 7    protected health information, including demographic 8    information, that may be contained within or extracted 9    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 10    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 11    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 12    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 13    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 14    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 15    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 16    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 17    160.103. 18        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 19    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 20    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 21    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 22    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 23Judicial Privacy Act and the Public Safety and Justice Privacy 24Act shall be redacted from public records prior to disclosure 25under this Act. 26    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a   HB1468- 24 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 2agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 3behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 4governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 5Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 6for purposes of this Act. 7    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 8information or limit the availability of records to the 9public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 10in this Act. 11(Source: P.A. 102-38, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 12102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-752, eff. 5-6-22; 102-753, eff. 131-1-23; 102-776, eff. 1-1-23; 102-791, eff. 5-13-22; 102-982, 14eff. 7-1-23; 102-1055, eff. 6-10-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 15103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 168-4-23; 103-540, eff. 1-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, 17eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.) 18    Section 105. The Election Code is amended by adding 19Section 10-10.3 as follows: 20    (10 ILCS 5/10-10.3 new)21    Sec. 10-10.3. Removal of an official's address information 22from the certificate of nomination or nomination papers.23    (a) As used in this Section, "home address" and "official" 24have the meanings given to those terms in Section 5 of the   HB1468- 25 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1Public Safety and Justice Privacy Act.2    (b) Upon expiration of the period for filing an objection 3to an official's certificate of nomination or nomination 4papers, an official who is a candidate may file a written 5request with the State Board of Elections for redaction of the 6official's home address information from the official's 7certificate of nomination or nomination papers. After receipt 8of the official's written request, the State Board of 9Elections shall redact or cause redaction of the official's 10home address from the official's certificate of nomination or 11nomination papers within 5 business days.12    (c) Prior to expiration of the period for filing an 13objection to an official's certificate of nomination or 14nomination papers, the home address information from the 15certificate of nomination or nomination papers of an official 16who is a candidate is available for public inspection. After 17redaction of an official's home address information under 18subsection (b), the home address information is available only 19for in camera inspection by the court reviewing an objection 20to the official's certificate of nomination or nomination 21papers. 22    Section 110. The Illinois Identification Card Act is 23amended by changing Sections 4 and 5 as follows: 24    (15 ILCS 335/4)  HB1468- 26 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    Sec. 4. Identification card. 2    (a) In accordance with the requirements of this Section, 3the Secretary of State shall issue a standard Illinois 4Identification Card, as well as a mobile Illinois 5Identification Card, to any natural person who is a resident 6of the State of Illinois who applies for such a card, or 7renewal thereof. No identification card shall be issued to any 8person who holds a valid foreign state identification card, 9license, or permit unless the person first surrenders to the 10Secretary of State the valid foreign state identification 11card, license, or permit. The card shall be prepared and 12supplied by the Secretary of State and shall include a 13photograph and signature or mark of the applicant. However, 14the Secretary of State may provide by rule for the issuance of 15Illinois Identification Cards without photographs if the 16applicant has a bona fide religious objection to being 17photographed or to the display of his or her photograph. The 18Illinois Identification Card may be used for identification 19purposes in any lawful situation only by the person to whom it 20was issued. As used in this Act, "photograph" means any color 21photograph or digitally produced and captured image of an 22applicant for an identification card. As used in this Act, 23"signature" means the name of a person as written by that 24person and captured in a manner acceptable to the Secretary of 25State.26    (a-5) If an applicant for an identification card has a   HB1468- 27 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1current driver's license or instruction permit issued by the 2Secretary of State, the Secretary may require the applicant to 3utilize the same residence address and name on the 4identification card, driver's license, and instruction permit 5records maintained by the Secretary. The Secretary may 6promulgate rules to implement this provision. 7    (a-10) If the applicant is a judicial officer as defined 8in Section 1-10 of the Judicial Privacy Act, an official as 9defined in Section 5 of the Public Safety and Justice Privacy 10Act, or a peace officer, the applicant may elect to have his or 11her office or work address listed on the card instead of the 12applicant's residence or mailing address. The Secretary may 13promulgate rules to implement this provision. For the purposes 14of this subsection (a-10), "peace officer" means any person 15who by virtue of his or her office or public employment is 16vested by law with a duty to maintain public order or to make 17arrests for a violation of any penal statute of this State, 18whether that duty extends to all violations or is limited to 19specific violations. 20    (a-15) The Secretary of State may provide for an expedited 21process for the issuance of an Illinois Identification Card. 22The Secretary shall charge an additional fee for the expedited 23issuance of an Illinois Identification Card, to be set by 24rule, not to exceed $75. All fees collected by the Secretary 25for expedited Illinois Identification Card service shall be 26deposited into the Secretary of State Special Services Fund.   HB1468- 28 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1The Secretary may adopt rules regarding the eligibility, 2process, and fee for an expedited Illinois Identification 3Card. If the Secretary of State determines that the volume of 4expedited identification card requests received on a given day 5exceeds the ability of the Secretary to process those requests 6in an expedited manner, the Secretary may decline to provide 7expedited services, and the additional fee for the expedited 8service shall be refunded to the applicant. 9    (a-20) The Secretary of State shall issue a standard 10Illinois Identification Card to a person committed to the 11Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, 12a Federal Bureau of Prisons facility located in Illinois, or a 13county jail or county department of corrections as follows: if 14the person has a social security number,15        (1) A committed person who has previously held an 16    Illinois Identification Card or an Illinois driver's 17    license shall submit an Identification Card verification 18    form to the Secretary of State, including a photograph 19    taken by the correctional facility, proof of residency 20    upon discharge, and a social security number, if the 21    committed person has a social security number. If the 22    committed person does not have a social security number 23    and is eligible for a social security number, the 24    Secretary of State shall not issue a standard Illinois 25    Identification Card until the committed person obtains a 26    social security number. If the committed person's   HB1468- 29 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    photograph and demographic information matches an existing 2    Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's license 3    and the Secretary of State verifies the applicant's social 4    security number with the Social Security Administration, 5    the Secretary of State shall issue the committed person a 6    standard Illinois Identification Card. If the photograph 7    or demographic information matches an existing Illinois 8    Identification Card or Illinois driver's license in 9    another person's name or identity, a standard Illinois 10    Identification Card shall not be issued until the 11    committed person submits a certified birth certificate and 12    social security card to the Secretary of State and the 13    Secretary of State verifies the identity of the committed 14    person. If the Secretary of State cannot find a match to an 15    existing Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's 16    license, the committed person may apply for a standard 17    Illinois Identification card as described in paragraph 18    (2).19        (2) A committed person who has not previously held an 20    Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's license 21    or for whom a match cannot be found as described in 22    paragraph (1) shall submit an Illinois Identification Card 23    verification form, including a photograph taken by the 24    correctional facility, a certified birth certificate, 25    proof of residency upon discharge, and a social security 26    number, if the committed has a social security number. If   HB1468- 30 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    the committed person does not have a social security 2    number and is eligible for a social security number, the 3    Secretary of State shall not issue a standard Illinois 4    Identification Card until the committed person obtains a 5    social security number. If the Secretary of State verifies 6    the applicant's social security number with the Social 7    Security Administration, the Secretary of State shall 8    issue the committed person a standard Illinois 9    Identification Card.10    The Illinois Identification Card verification form 11described in this subsection shall be prescribed by the 12Secretary of State. The Secretary of State and correctional 13facilities in this State shall establish a secure method to 14transfer the form.15    (a-25) The Secretary of State shall issue a limited-term 16Illinois Identification Card valid for 90 days to a committed 17person upon release on parole, mandatory supervised release, 18aftercare release, final discharge, or pardon from the 19Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, 20a Federal Bureau of Prisons facility located in Illinois, or a 21county jail or county department of corrections, if the 22released person does not obtain a standard Illinois 23Identification Card as described in subsection (a-20) prior to 24release but does present a Secretary of State prescribed 25Identification Card verification form completed by the 26correctional facility, verifying the released person's date of   HB1468- 31 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1birth, social security number, if the person has a social 2security number, and his or her Illinois residence address. 3The verification form must have been completed no more than 30 4days prior to the date of application for the Illinois 5Identification Card.6    Prior to the expiration of the 90-day period of the 7limited-term Illinois Identification Card, if the released 8person submits to the Secretary of State a certified copy of 9his or her birth certificate and his or her social security 10card, if the person has a social security number, or other 11documents authorized by the Secretary, a standard Illinois 12Identification Card shall be issued. A limited-term Illinois 13Identification Card may not be renewed. 14    This subsection shall not apply to a released person who 15was unable to obtain a standard Illinois Identification Card 16because his or her photograph or demographic information 17matched an existing Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 18driver's license in another person's name or identity or to a 19released person who does not have a social security number and 20is eligible for a social security number.21    (a-30) The Secretary of State shall issue a standard 22Illinois Identification Card to a person upon conditional 23release or absolute discharge from the custody of the 24Department of Human Services, if the person presents a 25certified copy of his or her birth certificate, social 26security card, if the person has a social security number, or   HB1468- 32 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1other documents authorized by the Secretary, and a document 2proving his or her Illinois residence address. The Secretary 3of State shall issue a standard Illinois Identification Card 4to a person prior to his or her conditional release or absolute 5discharge if personnel from the Department of Human Services 6bring the person to a Secretary of State location with the 7required documents. Documents proving residence address may 8include any official document of the Department of Human 9Services showing the person's address after release and a 10Secretary of State prescribed verification form, which may be 11executed by personnel of the Department of Human Services.12    (a-35) The Secretary of State shall issue a limited-term 13Illinois Identification Card valid for 90 days to a person 14upon conditional release or absolute discharge from the 15custody of the Department of Human Services, if the person is 16unable to present a certified copy of his or her birth 17certificate and social security card, if the person has a 18social security number, or other documents authorized by the 19Secretary, but does present a Secretary of State prescribed 20verification form completed by the Department of Human 21Services, verifying the person's date of birth and social 22security number, if the person has a social security number, 23and a document proving his or her Illinois residence address. 24The verification form must have been completed no more than 30 25days prior to the date of application for the Illinois 26Identification Card. The Secretary of State shall issue a   HB1468- 33 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1limited-term Illinois Identification Card to a person no 2sooner than 14 days prior to his or her conditional release or 3absolute discharge if personnel from the Department of Human 4Services bring the person to a Secretary of State location 5with the required documents. Documents proving residence 6address shall include any official document of the Department 7of Human Services showing the person's address after release 8and a Secretary of State prescribed verification form, which 9may be executed by personnel of the Department of Human 10Services. 11    (b) The Secretary of State shall issue a special Illinois 12Identification Card, which shall be known as an Illinois 13Person with a Disability Identification Card, to any natural 14person who is a resident of the State of Illinois, who is a 15person with a disability as defined in Section 4A of this Act, 16who applies for such card, or renewal thereof. No Illinois 17Person with a Disability Identification Card shall be issued 18to any person who holds a valid foreign state identification 19card, license, or permit unless the person first surrenders to 20the Secretary of State the valid foreign state identification 21card, license, or permit. The Secretary of State shall charge 22no fee to issue such card. The card shall be prepared and 23supplied by the Secretary of State, and shall include a 24photograph and signature or mark of the applicant, a 25designation indicating that the card is an Illinois Person 26with a Disability Identification Card, and shall include a   HB1468- 34 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1comprehensible designation of the type and classification of 2the applicant's disability as set out in Section 4A of this 3Act. However, the Secretary of State may provide by rule for 4the issuance of Illinois Person with a Disability 5Identification Cards without photographs if the applicant has 6a bona fide religious objection to being photographed or to 7the display of his or her photograph. If the applicant so 8requests, the card shall include a description of the 9applicant's disability and any information about the 10applicant's disability or medical history which the Secretary 11determines would be helpful to the applicant in securing 12emergency medical care. If a mark is used in lieu of a 13signature, such mark shall be affixed to the card in the 14presence of 2 two witnesses who attest to the authenticity of 15the mark. The Illinois Person with a Disability Identification 16Card may be used for identification purposes in any lawful 17situation by the person to whom it was issued.18    The Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card 19may be used as adequate documentation of disability in lieu of 20a physician's determination of disability, a determination of 21disability from a physician assistant, a determination of 22disability from an advanced practice registered nurse, or any 23other documentation of disability whenever any State law 24requires that a person with a disability provide such 25documentation of disability, however an Illinois Person with a 26Disability Identification Card shall not qualify the   HB1468- 35 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1cardholder to participate in any program or to receive any 2benefit which is not available to all persons with like 3disabilities. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, an 4Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card, or 5evidence that the Secretary of State has issued an Illinois 6Person with a Disability Identification Card, shall not be 7used by any person other than the person named on such card to 8prove that the person named on such card is a person with a 9disability or for any other purpose unless the card is used for 10the benefit of the person named on such card, and the person 11named on such card consents to such use at the time the card is 12so used.13    An optometrist's determination of a visual disability 14under Section 4A of this Act is acceptable as documentation 15for the purpose of issuing an Illinois Person with a 16Disability Identification Card. 17    When medical information is contained on an Illinois 18Person with a Disability Identification Card, the Office of 19the Secretary of State shall not be liable for any actions 20taken based upon that medical information.21    (c) The Secretary of State shall provide that each 22original or renewal Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 23Person with a Disability Identification Card issued to a 24person under the age of 21 shall be of a distinct nature from 25those Illinois Identification Cards or Illinois Person with a 26Disability Identification Cards issued to individuals 21 years   HB1468- 36 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1of age or older. The color designated for Illinois 2Identification Cards or Illinois Person with a Disability 3Identification Cards for persons under the age of 21 shall be 4at the discretion of the Secretary of State.5    (c-1) Each original or renewal Illinois Identification 6Card or Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card 7issued to a person under the age of 21 shall display the date 8upon which the person becomes 18 years of age and the date upon 9which the person becomes 21 years of age.10    (c-3) The General Assembly recognizes the need to identify 11military veterans living in this State for the purpose of 12ensuring that they receive all of the services and benefits to 13which they are legally entitled, including healthcare, 14education assistance, and job placement. To assist the State 15in identifying these veterans and delivering these vital 16services and benefits, the Secretary of State is authorized to 17issue Illinois Identification Cards and Illinois Person with a 18Disability Identification Cards with the word "veteran" 19appearing on the face of the cards. This authorization is 20predicated on the unique status of veterans. The Secretary may 21not issue any other identification card which identifies an 22occupation, status, affiliation, hobby, or other unique 23characteristics of the identification card holder which is 24unrelated to the purpose of the identification card.25    (c-5) Beginning on or before July 1, 2015, the Secretary 26of State shall designate a space on each original or renewal   HB1468- 37 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1identification card where, at the request of the applicant, 2the word "veteran" shall be placed. The veteran designation 3shall be available to a person identified as a veteran under 4subsection (b) of Section 5 of this Act who was discharged or 5separated under honorable conditions. 6    (d) The Secretary of State may issue a Senior Citizen 7discount card, to any natural person who is a resident of the 8State of Illinois who is 60 years of age or older and who 9applies for such a card or renewal thereof. The Secretary of 10State shall charge no fee to issue such card. The card shall be 11issued in every county and applications shall be made 12available at, but not limited to, nutrition sites, senior 13citizen centers and Area Agencies on Aging. The applicant, 14upon receipt of such card and prior to its use for any purpose, 15shall have affixed thereon in the space provided therefor his 16signature or mark.17    (e) The Secretary of State, in his or her discretion, may 18designate on each Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 19Person with a Disability Identification Card a space where the 20card holder may place a sticker or decal, issued by the 21Secretary of State, of uniform size as the Secretary may 22specify, that shall indicate in appropriate language that the 23card holder has renewed his or her Illinois Identification 24Card or Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card.25    (f)(1) The Secretary of State may issue a mobile 26identification card to an individual who is otherwise eligible   HB1468- 38 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1to hold a physical credential in addition to, and not instead 2of, an identification card if the Secretary of State has 3issued an identification card to the person. The data elements 4that are used to build an electronic credential must match the 5individual's current Department record.6    (2) The Secretary may enter into agreements or contract 7with an agency of the State, another state, the United States, 8or a third party to facilitate the issuance, use, and 9verification of a mobile identification card issued by the 10Secretary or another state.11    (3) Any mobile identification card issued by the Secretary 12shall be in accordance with the most recent AAMVA standards.13    (4) The Secretary shall design the mobile identification 14card in a manner that allows the credential holder to maintain 15physical possession of the device on which the mobile 16identification card is accessed during verification.17    (g) The verification process shall be implemented to 18require:19        (1) the relying parties to authenticate electronic 20    credentials in accordance with applicable AAMVA standards 21    prior to acceptance of the electronic credential;22        (2) the Secretary to ensure that electronic credential 23    data is subject to all jurisdictional data security and 24    privacy protection laws and regulations; and25        (3) the relying parties to request only electronic 26    credential data elements that are necessary to complete   HB1468- 39 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    the transaction for which data is being requested.2    (h) Privacy and tracking of data shall be restricted by 3implementing the following requirements:4        (1) the relying parties shall retain only electronic 5    credential data elements for which the relying party 6    explicitly obtained consent from the electronic credential 7    holder and shall inform the electronic credential holder 8    of the use and retention period of the electronic data 9    elements;10        (2) the Secretary shall use an electronic credential 11    system that is designed to maximize the privacy of the 12    credential holder in accordance with State and federal law 13    and shall not track or compile information without the 14    credential holder's consent; and15        (3) the Department shall only compile and disclose 16    information regarding the use of the credential as 17    required by State or federal law.18    (i)(1) The electronic credential holder shall be required 19to have the holder's their physical credential on the holder's 20their person for all purposes for which an identification card 21is required. No person, public entity, private entity, or 22agency shall establish a policy that requires an electronic 23credential instead of a physical credential.24    (2) Electronic credential systems shall be designed so 25that there is no requirement for the electronic credential 26holder to display or relinquish possession of the credential   HB1468- 40 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1holder's mobile device to relying parties for the acceptance 2of an electronic credential.3    (3) When required by law and upon request by law 4enforcement, a credential holder must provide the credential 5holder's physical credential.6    (4) Any law or regulation that requires an individual to 7surrender the individual's their physical credential to law 8enforcement does not apply to the device on which an 9electronic credential has been provisioned.10    (j) A person may be required to produce when so requested a 11physical identification card to a law enforcement officer, a 12representative of a State or federal department or agency, or 13a private entity and is subject to all applicable laws and 14consequences for failure to produce such an identification 15card.16    (k) The Secretary of State shall adopt such rules as are 17necessary to implement a mobile identification card.18    (l) The display of a mobile identification card shall not 19serve as consent or authorization for a law enforcement 20officer, or any other person, to search, view, or access any 21other data or application on the mobile device. If a person 22presents the person's mobile device to a law enforcement 23officer for purposes of displaying a mobile identification 24card, the law enforcement officer shall promptly return the 25mobile device to the person once the officer has had an 26opportunity to verify the identity of the person. Except for   HB1468- 41 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1willful and wanton misconduct, any law enforcement officer, 2court, or officer of the court presented with the device shall 3be immune from any liability resulting from damage to the 4mobile device.5    (m) The fee to install the application to display a mobile 6identification card as defined in this subsection shall not 7exceed $6.8    (n) As used in this Section:9    "AAMVA" means the American Association of Motor Vehicle 10Administrators.11    "Credential" means a driver's license, learner's permit, 12or identification card.13    "Credential holder" means the individual to whom a mobile 14driver's license or a mobile identification card is issued.15    "Data element" means a distinct component of a customer's 16information that is found on the Department's customer record.17    "Department" means the Secretary of State Department of 18Driver Services.19    "Electronic credential" means an electronic extension of 20the departmental issued physical credential that conveys 21identity and complies with AAMVA's mobile driver license 22Implementation guidelines and the ISO/IEC 18013-5 standard.23    "Electronic credential system" means a digital process 24that includes a method for provisioning electronic 25credentials, requesting and transmitting electronic credential 26data elements, and performing tasks to maintain the system.  HB1468- 42 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    "Full profile" means all the information provided on an 2identification card.3    "ISO" means the International Organization for 4Standardization, which creates uniform processes and 5procedures. 6    "Limited profile" means a portion of the information 7provided on an Identification Card.8    "Mobile identification card" means a data file that is 9available on any mobile device that has connectivity to the 10Internet through an application that allows the mobile device 11to download the data file from the Secretary of State, that 12contains all the data elements visible on the face and back of 13an identification card, and that displays the current status 14of the identification card. "Mobile identification card" does 15not include a copy, photograph, or image of an Illinois 16Identification Card that is not downloaded through the 17application on a mobile device.18    "Physical credential" means a Department-issued Department 19issued document that conveys identity in accordance with the 20Illinois Identification Card Act.21    "Provision" means the initial loading of an electronic 22credential onto a device.23    "Relying party" means the entity to which the credential 24holder presents the electronic credential.25    "Verification process" means a method of authenticating 26the electronic credential through the use of secured   HB1468- 43 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1encryption communication. 2    (o) (f) Upon providing the required documentation, at the 3request of the applicant, the identification card may reflect 4Gold Star Family designation. The Secretary shall designate a 5space on each original or renewal of an identification card 6for such designation. This designation shall be available to a 7person eligible for Gold Star license plates under subsection 8(f) of Section 6-106 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 9(Source: P.A. 102-299, eff. 8-6-21; 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 10103-345, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-782, eff. 118-6-24; 103-824, eff. 1-1-25; 103-933, eff. 1-1-25; revised 1211-26-24.) 13    (15 ILCS 335/5)14    Sec. 5. Applications. 15    (a) Any natural person who is a resident of the State of 16Illinois may file an application for an identification card, 17or for the renewal thereof, in a manner prescribed by the 18Secretary. Each original application shall be completed by the 19applicant in full and shall set forth the legal name, 20residence address and zip code, social security number, if the 21person has a social security number, birth date, sex and a 22brief description of the applicant. The applicant shall be 23photographed, unless the Secretary of State has provided by 24rule for the issuance of identification cards without 25photographs and the applicant is deemed eligible for an   HB1468- 44 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1identification card without a photograph under the terms and 2conditions imposed by the Secretary of State, and he or she 3shall also submit any other information as the Secretary may 4deem necessary or such documentation as the Secretary may 5require to determine the identity of the applicant. In 6addition to the residence address, the Secretary may allow the 7applicant to provide a mailing address. If the applicant is an 8employee of the Department of Children and Family Services 9with a job title of "Child Protection Specialist Trainee", 10"Child Protection Specialist", "Child Protection Advanced 11Specialist", "Child Welfare Specialist Trainee", "Child 12Welfare Specialist", or "Child Welfare Advanced Specialist" or 13a judicial officer as defined in Section 1-10 of the Judicial 14Privacy Act, an official as defined in Section 5 of the Public 15Safety and Justice Privacy Act, or a peace officer, the 16applicant may elect to have his or her office or work address 17in lieu of the applicant's residence or mailing address. An 18applicant for an Illinois Person with a Disability 19Identification Card must also submit with each original or 20renewal application, on forms prescribed by the Secretary, 21such documentation as the Secretary may require, establishing 22that the applicant is a "person with a disability" as defined 23in Section 4A of this Act, and setting forth the applicant's 24type and class of disability as set forth in Section 4A of this 25Act. For the purposes of this subsection (a), "peace officer" 26means any person who by virtue of his or her office or public   HB1468- 45 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1employment is vested by law with a duty to maintain public 2order or to make arrests for a violation of any penal statute 3of this State, whether that duty extends to all violations or 4is limited to specific violations. 5    (a-5) Upon the first issuance of a request for proposals 6for a digital driver's license and identification card 7issuance and facial recognition system issued after January 1, 82020 (the effective date of Public Act 101-513), and upon 9implementation of a new or revised system procured pursuant to 10that request for proposals, the Secretary shall permit 11applicants to choose between "male", "female", or "non-binary" 12when designating the applicant's sex on the identification 13card application form. The sex designated by the applicant 14shall be displayed on the identification card issued to the 15applicant. 16    (b) Beginning on or before July 1, 2015, for each original 17or renewal identification card application under this Act, the 18Secretary shall inquire as to whether the applicant is a 19veteran for purposes of issuing an identification card with a 20veteran designation under subsection (c-5) of Section 4 of 21this Act. The acceptable forms of proof shall include, but are 22not limited to, Department of Defense form DD-214, Department 23of Defense form DD-256 for applicants who did not receive a 24form DD-214 upon the completion of initial basic training, 25Department of Defense form DD-2 (Retired), an identification 26card issued under the federal Veterans Identification Card Act   HB1468- 46 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1of 2015, or a United States Department of Veterans Affairs 2summary of benefits letter. If the document cannot be stamped, 3the Illinois Department of Veterans' Affairs shall provide a 4certificate to the veteran to provide to the Secretary of 5State. The Illinois Department of Veterans' Affairs shall 6advise the Secretary as to what other forms of proof of a 7person's status as a veteran are acceptable.8    For each applicant who is issued an identification card 9with a veteran designation, the Secretary shall provide the 10Department of Veterans' Affairs with the applicant's name, 11address, date of birth, gender, and such other demographic 12information as agreed to by the Secretary and the Department. 13The Department may take steps necessary to confirm the 14applicant is a veteran. If after due diligence, including 15writing to the applicant at the address provided by the 16Secretary, the Department is unable to verify the applicant's 17veteran status, the Department shall inform the Secretary, who 18shall notify the applicant that he or she must confirm status 19as a veteran, or the identification card will be canceled 20cancelled. 21    For purposes of this subsection (b):22    "Armed forces" means any of the Armed Forces of the United 23States, including a member of any reserve component or 24National Guard unit. 25    "Veteran" means a person who has served in the armed 26forces and was discharged or separated under honorable   HB1468- 47 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1conditions. 2    (b-1) An applicant who is eligible for Gold Star license 3plates under Section 3-664 of the Illinois Vehicle Code may 4apply for an identification card with space for a designation 5as a Gold Star Family. The Secretary may waive any fee for this 6application. If the Secretary does not waive the fee, any fee 7charged to the applicant must be deposited into the Illinois 8Veterans Assistance Fund. The Secretary is authorized to issue 9rules to implement this subsection. 10    (c) All applicants for REAL ID compliant standard Illinois 11Identification Cards and Illinois Person with a Disability 12Identification Cards shall provide proof of lawful status in 13the United States as defined in 6 CFR 37.3, as amended. 14Applicants who are unable to provide the Secretary with proof 15of lawful status are ineligible for REAL ID compliant 16identification cards under this Act.17    (d) The Secretary of State may accept, as proof of date of 18birth and written signature for any applicant for a standard 19identification card who does not have a social security number 20or documentation issued by the United States Department of 21Homeland Security authorizing the applicant's presence in this 22country, any passport validly issued to the applicant from the 23applicant's country of citizenship or a consular 24identification document validly issued to the applicant by a 25consulate of that country as defined in Section 5 of the 26Consular Identification Document Act. Any such documents must   HB1468- 48 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1be either unexpired or presented by an applicant within 2 2years of its expiration date. 3(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 4103-888, eff. 8-9-24; 103-933, eff. 1-1-25; revised 12-1-24.) 5    Section 115. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 6changing Sections 3-405, 6-106, and 6-110 as follows: 7    (625 ILCS 5/3-405)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-405)8    Sec. 3-405. Application for registration. 9    (a) Every owner of a vehicle subject to registration under 10this Code shall make application to the Secretary of State for 11the registration of such vehicle upon the appropriate form or 12forms furnished by the Secretary. Every such original 13application shall bear the signature of the owner written with 14pen and ink and contain:15        1. The name, domicile address, as defined in Section 16    1-115.5 of this Code, (except as otherwise provided in 17    this paragraph 1), mail address of the owner or business 18    address of the owner if a firm, association, or 19    corporation, and, if available, email address of the 20    owner. If the mailing address is a post office box number, 21    the address listed on the driver license record may be 22    used to verify residence. A police officer, a deputy 23    sheriff, an elected sheriff, a law enforcement officer for 24    the Illinois State Police, a fire investigator, a state's   HB1468- 49 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    attorney, an assistant state's attorney, a state's 2    attorney special investigator, or a judicial officer may 3    elect to furnish the address of the headquarters of the 4    governmental entity, police district, or business address 5    where he or she works instead of his or her domicile 6    address, in which case that address shall be deemed to be 7    his or her domicile address for all purposes under this 8    Chapter 3. The spouse and children of a person who may 9    elect under this paragraph 1 to furnish the address of the 10    headquarters of the government entity, police district, or 11    business address where the person works instead of the 12    person's domicile address may, if they reside with that 13    person, also elect to furnish the address of the 14    headquarters of the government entity, police district, or 15    business address where the person works as their domicile 16    address, in which case that address shall be deemed to be 17    their domicile address for all purposes under this Chapter 18    3. In this paragraph 1: (A) "police officer" has the 19    meaning ascribed to "policeman" in Section 10-3-1 of the 20    Illinois Municipal Code; (B) "deputy sheriff" means a 21    deputy sheriff appointed under Section 3-6008 of the 22    Counties Code; (C) "elected sheriff" means a sheriff 23    commissioned pursuant to Section 3-6001 of the Counties 24    Code; (D) "fire investigator" means a person classified as 25    a peace officer under the Peace Officer Fire Investigation 26    Act; (E) "state's attorney", "assistant state's attorney",   HB1468- 50 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    and "state's attorney special investigator" mean a state's 2    attorney, assistant state's attorney, and state's attorney 3    special investigator commissioned or appointed under 4    Division 3-9 of the Counties Code; and (F) "judicial 5    officer" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1-10 of 6    the Judicial Privacy Act; and (G) "official" has the 7    meaning ascribed to it in Section 5 of the Public Safety 8    and Justice Privacy Act.9        2. A description of the vehicle, including such 10    information as is required in an application for a 11    certificate of title, determined under such standard 12    rating as may be prescribed by the Secretary.13        3. (Blank). 14        3.5. A space for a voluntary disclosure of a condition 15    that impedes effective communication under Section 16    3-405.5. 17        4. Such further information as may reasonably be 18    required by the Secretary to enable him to determine 19    whether the vehicle is lawfully entitled to registration 20    and the owner entitled to a certificate of title.21        5. An affirmation by the applicant that all 22    information set forth is true and correct. If the 23    application is for the registration of a motor vehicle, 24    the applicant also shall affirm that the motor vehicle is 25    insured as required by this Code, that such insurance will 26    be maintained throughout the period for which the motor   HB1468- 51 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    vehicle shall be registered, and that neither the owner, 2    nor any person operating the motor vehicle with the 3    owner's permission, shall operate the motor vehicle unless 4    the required insurance is in effect. If the person signing 5    the affirmation is not the sole owner of the vehicle, such 6    person shall be deemed to have affirmed on behalf of all 7    the owners of the vehicle. If the person signing the 8    affirmation is not an owner of the vehicle, such person 9    shall be deemed to have affirmed on behalf of the owner or 10    owners of the vehicle. The lack of signature on the 11    application shall not in any manner exempt the owner or 12    owners from any provisions, requirements or penalties of 13    this Code. 14    (b) When such application refers to a new vehicle 15purchased from a dealer the application shall be accompanied 16by a Manufacturer's Statement of Origin from the dealer, and a 17statement showing any lien retained by the dealer.18(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1069, eff. 7-1-23.) 19    (625 ILCS 5/6-106)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-106)20    Sec. 6-106. Application for license or instruction permit. 21    (a) Every application for any permit or license authorized 22to be issued under this Code shall be made upon a form 23furnished by the Secretary of State. Every application shall 24be accompanied by the proper fee and payment of such fee shall 25entitle the applicant to not more than 3 attempts to pass the   HB1468- 52 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1examination within a period of one year after the date of 2application. 3    (b) Every application shall state the legal name, zip 4code, date of birth, sex, and residence address of the 5applicant; briefly describe the applicant; state whether the 6applicant has theretofore been licensed as a driver, and, if 7so, when and by what state or country, and whether any such 8license has ever been cancelled, suspended, revoked or 9refused, and, if so, the date and reason for such 10cancellation, suspension, revocation or refusal; shall include 11an affirmation by the applicant that all information set forth 12is true and correct; and shall bear the applicant's signature. 13In addition to the residence address, the Secretary may allow 14the applicant to provide a mailing address. In the case of an 15applicant who is a judicial officer, official, or peace 16officer, the Secretary may allow the applicant to provide an 17office or work address in lieu of a residence or mailing 18address. The application form may also require the statement 19of such additional relevant information as the Secretary of 20State shall deem necessary to determine the applicant's 21competency and eligibility. The Secretary of State may, in his 22discretion, by rule or regulation, provide that an application 23for a drivers license or permit may include a suitable 24photograph of the applicant in the form prescribed by the 25Secretary, and he may further provide that each drivers 26license shall include a photograph of the driver. The   HB1468- 53 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1Secretary of State may utilize a photograph process or system 2most suitable to deter alteration or improper reproduction of 3a drivers license and to prevent substitution of another photo 4thereon. For the purposes of this subsection (b): ,5    "Official" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 5 of 6the Public Safety and Justice Privacy Act. 7     "Peace "peace officer" means any person who by virtue of 8his or her office or public employment is vested by law with a 9duty to maintain public order or to make arrests for a 10violation of any penal statute of this State, whether that 11duty extends to all violations or is limited to specific 12violations. 13    (b-1) Every application shall state the social security 14number of the applicant; except if the applicant is applying 15for a standard driver's license and, on the date of 16application, is ineligible for a social security number, then:17        (1) if the applicant has documentation, issued by the 18    United States Department of Homeland Security, authorizing 19    the applicant's presence in this country, the applicant 20    shall provide such documentation instead of a social 21    security number; and22        (2) if the applicant does not have documentation 23    described in paragraph (1), the applicant shall provide, 24    instead of a social security number, the following:25            (A) documentation establishing that the applicant 26        has resided in this State for a period in excess of one   HB1468- 54 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1        year;2            (B) a passport validly issued to the applicant 3        from the applicant's country of citizenship or a 4        consular identification document validly issued to the 5        applicant by a consulate of that country as defined in 6        Section 5 of the Consular Identification Document Act, 7        as long as such documents are either unexpired or 8        presented by an applicant within 2 years of its 9        expiration date; and 10            (C) a social security card, if the applicant has a 11        social security number. 12    (b-3) Upon the first issuance of a request for proposals 13for a digital driver's license and identification card 14issuance and facial recognition system issued after January 1, 152020 (the effective date of Public Act 101-513), and upon 16implementation of a new or revised system procured pursuant to 17that request for proposals, the Secretary shall permit 18applicants to choose between "male", "female" or "non-binary" 19when designating the applicant's sex on the driver's license 20application form. The sex designated by the applicant shall be 21displayed on the driver's license issued to the applicant. 22    (b-5) Every applicant for a REAL ID compliant driver's 23license or permit shall provide proof of lawful status in the 24United States as defined in 6 CFR 37.3, as amended. 25    (c) The application form shall include a notice to the 26applicant of the registration obligations of sex offenders   HB1468- 55 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1under the Sex Offender Registration Act. The notice shall be 2provided in a form and manner prescribed by the Secretary of 3State. For purposes of this subsection (c), "sex offender" has 4the meaning ascribed to it in Section 2 of the Sex Offender 5Registration Act. 6    (d) Any male United States citizen or immigrant who 7applies for any permit or license authorized to be issued 8under this Code or for a renewal of any permit or license, and 9who is at least 18 years of age but less than 26 years of age, 10must be registered in compliance with the requirements of the 11federal Military Selective Service Act. The Secretary of State 12must forward in an electronic format the necessary personal 13information regarding the applicants identified in this 14subsection (d) to the Selective Service System. The 15applicant's signature on the application serves as an 16indication that the applicant either has already registered 17with the Selective Service System or that he is authorizing 18the Secretary to forward to the Selective Service System the 19necessary information for registration. The Secretary must 20notify the applicant at the time of application that his 21signature constitutes consent to registration with the 22Selective Service System, if he is not already registered. 23    (e) Beginning on or before July 1, 2015, for each original 24or renewal driver's license application under this Code, the 25Secretary shall inquire as to whether the applicant is a 26veteran for purposes of issuing a driver's license with a   HB1468- 56 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1veteran designation under subsection (e-5) of Section 6-110 of 2this Code. The acceptable forms of proof shall include, but 3are not limited to, Department of Defense form DD-214, 4Department of Defense form DD-256 for applicants who did not 5receive a form DD-214 upon the completion of initial basic 6training, Department of Defense form DD-2 (Retired), an 7identification card issued under the federal Veterans 8Identification Card Act of 2015, or a United States Department 9of Veterans Affairs summary of benefits letter. If the 10document cannot be stamped, the Illinois Department of 11Veterans' Affairs shall provide a certificate to the veteran 12to provide to the Secretary of State. The Illinois Department 13of Veterans' Affairs shall advise the Secretary as to what 14other forms of proof of a person's status as a veteran are 15acceptable.16    For each applicant who is issued a driver's license with a 17veteran designation, the Secretary shall provide the 18Department of Veterans' Affairs with the applicant's name, 19address, date of birth, gender and such other demographic 20information as agreed to by the Secretary and the Department. 21The Department may take steps necessary to confirm the 22applicant is a veteran. If after due diligence, including 23writing to the applicant at the address provided by the 24Secretary, the Department is unable to verify the applicant's 25veteran status, the Department shall inform the Secretary, who 26shall notify the applicant that he or she must confirm status   HB1468- 57 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1as a veteran, or the driver's license will be cancelled. 2    For purposes of this subsection (e):3    "Armed forces" means any of the Armed Forces of the United 4States, including a member of any reserve component or 5National Guard unit. 6    "Veteran" means a person who has served in the armed 7forces and was discharged or separated under honorable 8conditions. 9    (f) An applicant who is eligible for Gold Star license 10plates under Section 3-664 of this Code may apply for an 11original or renewal driver's license with space for a 12designation as a Gold Star Family. The Secretary may waive any 13fee for this application. If the Secretary does not waive the 14fee, any fee charged to the applicant must be deposited into 15the Illinois Veterans Assistance Fund. The Secretary is 16authorized to issue rules to implement this subsection. 17(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 18103-933, eff. 1-1-25.) 19    (625 ILCS 5/6-110)20    Sec. 6-110. Licenses issued to drivers. 21    (a) The Secretary of State shall issue to every qualifying 22applicant a driver's license as applied for, which license 23shall bear a distinguishing number assigned to the licensee, 24the legal name, signature, zip code, date of birth, residence 25address, and a brief description of the licensee.   HB1468- 58 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    Licenses issued shall also indicate the classification and 2the restrictions under Section 6-104 of this Code. The 3Secretary may adopt rules to establish informational 4restrictions that can be placed on the driver's license 5regarding specific conditions of the licensee.6    A driver's license issued may, in the discretion of the 7Secretary, include a suitable photograph of a type prescribed 8by the Secretary. 9    (a-1) If the licensee is less than 18 years of age, unless 10one of the exceptions in subsection (a-2) apply, the license 11shall, as a matter of law, be invalid for the operation of any 12motor vehicle during the following times:13        (A) Between 11:00 p.m. Friday and 6:00 a.m. Saturday;14        (B) Between 11:00 p.m. Saturday and 6:00 a.m. on 15    Sunday; and16        (C) Between 10:00 p.m. on Sunday to Thursday, 17    inclusive, and 6:00 a.m. on the following day.18    (a-2) The driver's license of a person under the age of 18 19shall not be invalid as described in subsection (a-1) of this 20Section if the licensee under the age of 18 was:21        (1) accompanied by the licensee's parent or guardian 22    or other person in custody or control of the minor;23        (2) on an errand at the direction of the minor's 24    parent or guardian, without any detour or stop;25        (3) in a motor vehicle involved in interstate travel;26        (4) going to or returning home from an employment   HB1468- 59 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    activity, without any detour or stop;2        (5) involved in an emergency;3        (6) going to or returning home from, without any 4    detour or stop, an official school, religious, or other 5    recreational activity supervised by adults and sponsored 6    by a government or governmental agency, a civic 7    organization, or another similar entity that takes 8    responsibility for the licensee, without any detour or 9    stop;10        (7) exercising First Amendment rights protected by the 11    United States Constitution, such as the free exercise of 12    religion, freedom of speech, and the right of assembly; or13        (8) married or had been married or is an emancipated 14    minor under the Emancipation of Minors Act.15    (a-2.5) The driver's license of a person who is 17 years of 16age and has been licensed for at least 12 months is not invalid 17as described in subsection (a-1) of this Section while the 18licensee is participating as an assigned driver in a Safe 19Rides program that meets the following criteria: 20        (1) the program is sponsored by the Boy Scouts of 21    America or another national public service organization; 22    and23        (2) the sponsoring organization carries liability 24    insurance covering the program. 25    (a-3) If a graduated driver's license holder over the age 26of 18 committed an offense against traffic regulations   HB1468- 60 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1governing the movement of vehicles or any violation of Section 26-107 or Section 12-603.1 of this Code in the 6 months prior to 3the graduated driver's license holder's 18th birthday, and was 4subsequently convicted of the offense, the provisions of 5subsection (a-1) shall continue to apply until such time as a 6period of 6 consecutive months has elapsed without an 7additional violation and subsequent conviction of an offense 8against traffic regulations governing the movement of vehicles 9or Section 6-107 or Section 12-603.1 of this Code. 10    (a-4) If an applicant for a driver's license or 11instruction permit has a current identification card issued by 12the Secretary of State, the Secretary may require the 13applicant to utilize the same residence address and name on 14the identification card, driver's license, and instruction 15permit records maintained by the Secretary. The Secretary may 16promulgate rules to implement this provision. 17    (a-5) If an applicant for a driver's license is an 18employee of the Department of Children and Family Services 19with a job title of "Child Protection Specialist Trainee", 20"Child Protection Specialist", "Child Protection Advanced 21Specialist", "Child Welfare Specialist Trainee", "Child 22Welfare Specialist", or "Child Welfare Advanced Specialist" or 23a judicial officer, official, or a peace officer, the 24applicant may elect to have his or her office or work address 25listed on the license instead of the applicant's residence or 26mailing address. The Secretary of State shall adopt rules to   HB1468- 61 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1implement this subsection (a-5). For the purposes of this 2subsection (a-5): ,3    "Official" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 5 of 4the Public Safety and Justice Privacy Act. 5     "Peace "peace officer" means any person who by virtue of 6his or her office or public employment is vested by law with a 7duty to maintain public order or to make arrests for a 8violation of any penal statute of this State, whether that 9duty extends to all violations or is limited to specific 10violations. 11    (b) Until the Secretary of State establishes a First 12Person Consent organ and tissue donor registry under Section 136-117 of this Code, the Secretary of State shall provide a 14format on the reverse of each driver's license issued which 15the licensee may use to execute a document of gift conforming 16to the provisions of the Illinois Anatomical Gift Act. The 17format shall allow the licensee to indicate the gift intended, 18whether specific organs, any organ, or the entire body, and 19shall accommodate the signatures of the donor and 2 witnesses. 20The Secretary shall also inform each applicant or licensee of 21this format, describe the procedure for its execution, and may 22offer the necessary witnesses; provided that in so doing, the 23Secretary shall advise the applicant or licensee that he or 24she is under no compulsion to execute a document of gift. A 25brochure explaining this method of executing an anatomical 26gift document shall be given to each applicant or licensee.   HB1468- 62 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1The brochure shall advise the applicant or licensee that he or 2she is under no compulsion to execute a document of gift, and 3that he or she may wish to consult with family, friends, or 4clergy before doing so. The Secretary of State may undertake 5additional efforts, including education and awareness 6activities, to promote organ and tissue donation. 7    (c) The Secretary of State shall designate on each 8driver's license issued a space where the licensee may place a 9sticker or decal of the uniform size as the Secretary may 10specify, which sticker or decal may indicate in appropriate 11language that the owner of the license carries an Emergency 12Medical Information Card. 13    The sticker may be provided by any person, hospital, 14school, medical group, or association interested in assisting 15in implementing the Emergency Medical Information Card, but 16shall meet the specifications as the Secretary may by rule or 17regulation require. 18    (d) The Secretary of State shall designate on each 19driver's license issued a space where the licensee may 20indicate his blood type and RH factor. 21    (e) The Secretary of State shall provide that each 22original or renewal driver's license issued to a licensee 23under 21 years of age shall be of a distinct nature from those 24driver's licenses issued to individuals 21 years of age and 25older. The color designated for driver's licenses for 26licensees under 21 years of age shall be at the discretion of   HB1468- 63 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1the Secretary of State. 2    (e-1) The Secretary shall provide that each driver's 3license issued to a person under the age of 21 displays the 4date upon which the person becomes 18 years of age and the date 5upon which the person becomes 21 years of age. 6    (e-3) The General Assembly recognizes the need to identify 7military veterans living in this State for the purpose of 8ensuring that they receive all of the services and benefits to 9which they are legally entitled, including health care 10healthcare, education assistance, and job placement. To assist 11the State in identifying these veterans and delivering these 12vital services and benefits, the Secretary of State is 13authorized to issue drivers' licenses with the word "veteran" 14appearing on the face of the licenses. This authorization is 15predicated on the unique status of veterans. The Secretary may 16not issue any other driver's license which identifies an 17occupation, status, affiliation, hobby, or other unique 18characteristics of the license holder which is unrelated to 19the purpose of the driver's license.20    (e-5) Beginning on or before July 1, 2015, the Secretary 21of State shall designate a space on each original or renewal 22driver's license where, at the request of the applicant, the 23word "veteran" shall be placed. The veteran designation shall 24be available to a person identified as a veteran under 25subsection (e) of Section 6-106 of this Code who was 26discharged or separated under honorable conditions.   HB1468- 64 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1    (e-7) Upon providing the required documentation, at the 2request of the applicant, the driver's license may reflect 3Gold Star Family designation. The Secretary shall designate a 4space on each original or renewal driver's license for such 5designation. This designation shall be available to a person 6eligible for Gold Star license plates under subsection (f) of 7Section 6-106 of this Code. 8    (f) The Secretary of State shall inform all Illinois 9licensed commercial motor vehicle operators of the 10requirements of the Uniform Commercial Driver License Act, 11Article V of this Chapter, and shall make provisions to ensure 12insure that all drivers, seeking to obtain a commercial 13driver's license, be afforded an opportunity prior to April 1, 141992, to obtain the license. The Secretary is authorized to 15extend driver's license expiration dates, and assign specific 16times, dates and locations where these commercial driver's 17tests shall be conducted. Any applicant, regardless of the 18current expiration date of the applicant's driver's license, 19may be subject to any assignment by the Secretary. Failure to 20comply with the Secretary's assignment may result in the 21applicant's forfeiture of an opportunity to receive a 22commercial driver's license prior to April 1, 1992. 23    (g) The Secretary of State shall designate on a driver's 24license issued, a space where the licensee may indicate that 25he or she has drafted a living will in accordance with the 26Illinois Living Will Act or a durable power of attorney for   HB1468- 65 -LRB104 06726 RLC 16762 b1health care in accordance with the Illinois Power of Attorney 2Act. 3    (g-1) The Secretary of State, in his or her discretion, 4may designate on each driver's license issued a space where 5the licensee may place a sticker or decal, issued by the 6Secretary of State, of uniform size as the Secretary may 7specify, that shall indicate in appropriate language that the 8owner of the license has renewed his or her driver's license. 9    (h) A person who acts in good faith in accordance with the 10terms of this Section is not liable for damages in any civil 11action or subject to prosecution in any criminal proceeding 12for his or her act. 13    (i) The Secretary shall designate a space on each original 14or renewal of a driver's license, at the request of the 15applicant, for a designation as a Gold Star Family. This 16designation shall be available to a person eligible for Gold 17Star license plates under subsection (f) of Section 6-106 of 18this Code. 19(Source: P.A. 103-888, eff. 8-9-24; 103-933, eff. 1-1-25; 20revised 11-26-24.) 21    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.